lt-LT: SIM kortelės charakteristikos: Dviguba; Integruota; Hibridinė dviguba; Single; Trys; Kita
es: Capacidad de tarjeta SIM: Doble; Incorporado; Híbrido dual; Individual; Triple; Otros
fr: Capacité de la carte SIM: Double; Intégrée; Dual SIM Hybride; Unique; Triple; Autre
sl-SI: Zmogljivost kartice SIM: Dvojna; Vdelana; Hibridna dvojna; Enojna; Trojna; Drugo
fi: Sim-korttivalmius: Kaksiosainen; Upotettu; Kaksoishybridi; Yksittäinen; Kolminkertainen; Muu
it: Capacità della carta SIM: Doppie; Incorporata; Hybrid dual; Singolo; Tripla; Altro
sk-SK: Možnosť SIM karty: Dvojitý; Vložený; Hybridný duálny; Jeden; Trojitý; Iné
cs: Funkce SIM karty: Duální; Vložená; Hybridní duální; Jedna funkce; Trojitý; Jiné
de: SIM-Karten-Fähigkeit: Zwei; Eingebettet; Hybrid-Dual; Einzel; Dreifach; Sonstiges
tr: Sim Kart Özelliği: Çift; Gömülü; Hibrit çift; Tek; Üçlü; Diğer
sv: Simkortskapacitet: Dubbel; Inbäddad; Hybrid dubbel; Enkel; Trippel; Övrigt
da: SIM-kort-kapacitet: Dobbelt; Indlejret; Hybrid dobbelt; Enkelt; Tredobbelt; Andet
ko: SIM 카드 삽입 방식: 듀얼; 임베디드; 하이브리드 듀얼; 싱글; 트리플; 기타
th: ความสามารถของซิมการ์ด: คู่; ซิมแบบฝัง; สองซิมแบบไฮบริด; แบบเดี่ยว; แบบสามชั้น; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Capacitatea cartelei SIM: Dual; Încorporat; Dual hibrid; Simplu; Triplu; Altele
hu: SIM-kártya funkciója: Kettős; Beágyazott; Hibrid kettős; Egyes; Hármas; Egyéb
nb: Mulighet for sim-kort: Dobbel; Integrert; Dobbelhybrid; Enkel; Trippel; Annet
pl: Obsługa kart SIM: Dual; Osadzone; Hybrydowy podwójny; Singiel; Potrójne; Inne
en: SIM card capability: Dual; Embedded; Hybrid dual; Single; Triple; Other
vi: Dung lượng thẻ sim: Hai nhiệt độ; Tích hợp; Kép lai; Đơn; Gấp ba; Khác
pt-PT: Capacidade do cartão SIM: Duplo; Integrado; Híbrido duplo; Único; Triplo; Outro
ja: SIMカード対応: デュアル; 埋め込み型; ハイブリッドデュアル; シングル; トリプル; その他
bg-BG: Възможност за SIM карта: Двойна; Вградена; Хибридна двойна; Единична; Тройна; Други
zh-TW: SIM卡性能: 雙重; 嵌入式; 雙混合; 單倍; 三倍; 其他
zh-CN: SIM 卡功能: 双温区; 嵌入式; 混合双卡; 单; 三; 其他
ru: Возможности SIM-карты: Двойной; Встроенный; Гибридный двойной; Одна; Три; Другое
hr-HR: Mogućnost SIM kartice: Dvostruka; Ugrađeni; Hibridni dvojni; Jednostruka; Trostruka; Ostalo
el: Δυνατότητα κάρτας SIM: Διπλός; Ενσωματωμένο; Υβριδικό διπλό; Μονό; Τρία; Άλλο
nl: Simkaartmogelijkheden: Dubbel; Ingebed; Hybride duaal; Single; Driedubbel; Andere
pt-BR: Capacidade do cartão SIM: Dual; Integrado; Dual híbrido; Único; Triplo; Outro